Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.095

Establishment of eligibility record date required.

The applicant shall establish an eligibility record date, which shall not be less than ninety days prior to the date of adoption of the plan by the converting savings bank's board of directors.

[ 1981 c 85 s 18.]